Hawaii statutes.
PART
VIII. CHILD CARE

Note

Part heading amended by L 2001, c 201, §3.

Cross References

Early intervention services for infants and toddlers, see
§§321-351 to 321-354.

Attorney General Opinions

Licensing of church-sponsored day care programs constitutional.
Att. Gen. Op. 85-25.

A. General

§346-151 Definitions. For the purposes
of this part:

"Care" refers to those situations
where a person or organization has agreed to assume and has been entrusted with
the responsibility for the child's supervision, development, safety, and
protection apart from the parent or guardian.

"Child abuse record check" means an
examination of an individual's child abuse confirmation history through:

(1) An initial name inquiry into the state child
welfare record files;

(2) Subsequent child abuse confirmation history
checks for new hires and rehires; and

(3) An annual name inquiry into state child welfare
record files.

"Child care facility" means a place
maintained by any individual, organization, or agency for the purpose of
providing care for children with or without charging a fee at any time. It
includes a family child care home, group child care home, and group child care
center.

"Child care subsidy" means a payment
made to low-income parents, guardians, or other responsible parties to pay for
the care of a child under the age of thirteen years, or age thirteen years or
older if the child has qualifying special needs as defined under federal law.

"Family child care home" means a
private residence, including a home, apartment, unit, or townhouse, as those
terms are defined in section 502C-1, at which care may be provided for three to
no more than six children who are unrelated to the caregiver by blood,
marriage, or adoption, at any given time.

"Group child care center" means a
facility, other than a private home, at which care is provided.

"Group child care home" means a
facility, which may be an extended or modified private home, at which care is
provided for seven to twelve children.

"Provider" means the person who is
issued the license or certificate of registration, as the case may be, by the
department to provide care in a child care facility. [L 1985, c 208, pt of §2;
am L 1986, c 297, §2; am L 1988, c 125, §1; am L 1998, c 5, §1; am L 1999, c 242,
§§4, 8(2); am L 2001, c 201, §2 and c 225, §3; am L 2003, c 95, §9(5); am L
2005, c 20, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Program providing care and supervision of children and
religious instruction provides "care". Att. Gen. Op. 85-25.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next